Utah statutes.
34-33-1.   Unlawful for employer to charge employee medical examination fee.
It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation or partnership to
charge any person a medical fee for the physical examination of any applicant
for employment with such person, firm, corporation or partnership, or to
deduct the cost of such physical examination from the money earned by such
employee or to make any charge for or to deduct from the earnings of such
employee any medical fee for any physical examination upon the re-employment
of any employee who may have discontinued such employment, or have been
discharged or his employment otherwise terminated; nor shall any employer, as
a condition of pre-employment, employment, or continued employment, require
any employee or person applying for employment to submit to or obtain a
physical examination, unless such employer shall pay all costs of such
physical examination.
